dev/infreq-apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="papyr/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usane</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usar</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usen</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="yankee__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vinst/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rane</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rum/mel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lane</l>
          <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>melen</l>
          <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mel</l>
          <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nidskrift__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cognac__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="j__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="C__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>C</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="å__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/onn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ennene</l>
          <r>onn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enner</l>
          <r>onn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onna</l>
          <r>onn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onnene</l>
          <r>onn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onner</l>
          <r>onn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onni</l>
          <r>onn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onn</l>
          <r>onn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tøystrimmel"><i>tøystrim</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vedbyrd"><i>vedbyrd</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="undermengd"><i>undermengd</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vedkjenningsskrift"><i>vedkjenningsskrift</i><par n="nidskrift__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stoffmengd"><i>stoffmengd</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="steinfonn"><i>steinf</i><par n="f/onn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vestlandsbygd"><i>vestlandsbygd</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turketrommel"><i>turketrom</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voldsferd"><i>voldsferd</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snøfonn"><i>snøf</i><par n="f/onn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spekkstrimmel"><i>spekkstrim</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tiltru"><i>tiltru</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="utreis"><i>utreis</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vinsjtrommel"><i>vinsjtrom</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svaleurt"><i>svaleurt</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tystrimmel"><i>tystrim</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="transitthamn"><i>transitthamn</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tømmersaks"><i>tømmersaks</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vinster"><i>vinst</i><par n="vinst/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="viljesak"><i>viljesak</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stolpebu"><i>stolpebu</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turrtall"><i>turrtall</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ubønn"><i>ubønn</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="føykefonn"><i>føykef</i><par n="f/onn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="familiegudstenest"><i>familiegudstenest</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="augusthimmel"><i>augusthim</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fruktbarheit"><i>fruktbarheit</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="altarskammel"><i>altarskam</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hengjebjørk"><i>hengjebjørk</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heisesjakt"><i>heisesjakt</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forbrytarverd"><i>forbrytarverd</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flygeskrift"><i>flygeskrift</i><par n="nidskrift__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brennenøtt"><i>brennenøtt</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="håballstid"><i>håballstid</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fordør"><i>fordør</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flekksott"><i>flekksott</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="føykjefonn"><i>føykjef</i><par n="f/onn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dogmetru"><i>dogmetru</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fristund"><i>fristund</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drivfjør"><i>drivfjør</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hjartero"><i>hjartero</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="air condition"><i>air<b/>condition</i><par n="cognac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hjørnesteinsbedrift"><i>hjørnesteinsbedrift</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autoritetsfrykt"><i>autoritetsfrykt</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="føremiddagsøkt"><i>føremiddagsøkt</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bønskrift"><i>bønskrift</i><par n="nidskrift__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arbeidshjelp"><i>arbeidshjelp</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="finnferd"><i>finnferd</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flygehud"><i>flygehud</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alterskammel"><i>alterskam</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forsytingsbør"><i>forsytingsbør</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="embetsdrakt"><i>embetsdrakt</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fyllingsdør"><i>fyllingsdør</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flogskrift"><i>flogskrift</i><par n="nidskrift__n"/></e>
    <e lm="datid"><i>datid</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bøneskammel"><i>bøneskam</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etasjeseng"><i>etasjeseng</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="air conditioning"><i>air<b/>conditioning</i><par n="cognac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="broderånd"><i>broderånd</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bønneskammel"><i>bønneskam</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barmark"><i>barmark</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cover charge"><i>cover<b/>charge</i><par n="cognac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fonn"><i>f</i><par n="f/onn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eldgogn"><i>eldgogn</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saumnål"><i>saumnål</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rummel"><i>rum</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skummamjølk"><i>skummamjølk</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="papirstrimmel"><i>papirstrim</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="overflod"><i>overflod</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pommes frites"><i>pommes<b/>frites</i><par n="cognac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ovmakt"><i>ovmakt</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sitrusfrukt"><i>sitrusfrukt</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kjøtslyst"><i>kjøtslyst</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="misvon"><i>misvon</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="menneskevrimmel"><i>menneskevrim</i><par n="rum/mel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="myrull"><i>myrull</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kremmarånd"><i>kremmarånd</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kyrkjetid"><i>kyrkjetid</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mix double"><i>mix<b/>double</i><par n="cognac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kvilestund"><i>kvilestund</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lisensavgift"><i>lisensavgift</i><par n="å__n"/></e>
